Utah statutes.
26-8a-406.   Ground ambulance and paramedic licenses -- Parties.

(1)  When an applicant approved under Section 26-8a-404 seeks licensure under the provisions of Sections 26-8a-406 through 26-8a-409, the department shall:

(a)  issue a notice of agency action to the applicant to commence an informal administrative proceeding;

(b)  provide notice of the application to all interested parties; and

(c)  publish notice of the application, at the applicant's expense:

(i)  once a week for four consecutive weeks, in a newspaper of general circulation in the geographic service area that is the subject of the application; and

(ii)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for four weeks.

(2)  An interested party has 30 days to object to an application.

(3)  If an interested party objects, the presiding officer shall join the interested party as an indispensable party to the proceeding.

(4)  The department may join the proceeding as a party to represent the public interest.

(5)  Others who may be affected by the grant of a license to the applicant may join the proceeding, if the presiding officer determines that they meet the requirement of legal standing.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

